Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-940
Applicability of act.

The Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act applies to protection orders issued before January 1, 2004, and to continuing actions for enforcement of foreign protection orders commenced before January 1, 2004. A request for enforcement of a foreign protection order made on or after January 1, 2004, for violations of a foreign protection order occurring before January 1, 2004, is governed by the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 98.